Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB262.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2917YC (3) 91 sb/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 724.8, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. Is less than eighteen years of age for a professional 3 permit or less than twenty-one years of age for a 4 nonprofessional permit . 5 Sec. 2. Section 724.15, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 6 2025, is amended to read as follows: 7 a. Under twenty-one eighteen years of age except for those 8 persons included in section 724.22, subsection 4 , who acquire a 9 pistol or revolver when the personâs duty so requires . 10 Sec. 3. Section 724.22, subsections 2, 5, and 8, Code 2025, 11 are amended to read as follows: 12 2. Except as provided in subsections 4 and 5 , a person who 13 sells, loans, gives, or makes available a pistol or revolver 14 or ammunition for a pistol or revolver to a person below the 15 age of twenty-one eighteen commits a serious misdemeanor for a 16 first offense and a class âDâ felony for second and subsequent 17 offenses. 18 5. a. A parent , or guardian , or spouse who is twenty-one 19 eighteen years of age or older, of a person under the age of 20 twenty-one eighteen may allow the person, while under direct 21 supervision, to possess a pistol or revolver or the ammunition 22 therefor for any lawful purpose, or while the person receives 23 instruction in the proper use thereof from an instructor 24 twenty-one eighteen years of age or older, with the consent of 25 such parent, guardian , or spouse. 26 b. As used in this section , âdirect supervisionâ means 27 supervision provided by the parent, guardian, spouse, or 28 instructor who is twenty-one eighteen years of age or older, 29 who maintains a physical presence near the supervised person 30 conducive to hands-on instruction, who maintains visual and 31 verbal contact at all times with the supervised person, and who 32 is not intoxicated as provided under the conditions set out 33 in section 321J.2, subsection 1 , or under the influence of an 34 illegal drug. 35 -1- LSB 2917YC (3) 91 sb/js 1/ 2 H.F. _____ 8. A parent, guardian, or spouse , who is twenty-one eighteen 1 years of age or older, of a minor under the age of fourteen 2 years and who allows that minor to possess a pistol or revolver 3 or the ammunition pursuant hereto , shall be strictly liable to 4 an injured party for all damages resulting from the possession 5 of the pistol or revolver or ammunition therefor by that minor. 6 Sec. 4. Section 724.22, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended 7 by striking the subsection. 8